Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.120

Designation of agency to carry out federal social security disability program.

Such state agency as the governor may designate is hereby authorized to enter into an agreement on behalf of the state with the Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare to carry out the provisions of the federal social security act, as amended, relating to the making of determinations of disability under title II of such act.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.17.120. Prior: 1955 c 200 s 1. Formerly RCW 74.44.010.]

NOTES:

Federal social security for public employees: Chapters 41.33, 41.41, 41.47, and 41.48 RCW.